Maryland, session 2025, HB0163.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
15–304.1.
(A) THERE IS AN OUT–OF–STATE MOTOR HOME AND RECREATIONAL
TRAILER VEHICLE SHOW PERMIT.
(B) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY ISSUE A PERMIT UNDER THIS SECTION TO A
DEALER OF MOTOR HOMES OR RECREATIONAL TRAILERS LICENSED IN ANOTHER
STATE ONLY IF THAT STATE RECIPROCALLY AUTHORIZES MARYLAND DEALERS OF
MOTOR HOMES AND RECREATIONAL TRAILERS TO DISPLAY OR EXHIBIT MOTOR
HOMES OR RECREATIONAL TRAILERS AT VEHICLE SHOWS IN THAT STATE.
(C) A PERMIT HOLDER:
(1) MAY DISPLAY OR EXHIBIT MOTOR HOMES OR RECREATIONAL
TRAILERS AT A VEHICLE SHOW FOR MOTOR HOMES OR RECREATIONAL TRAILERS IN
WORCESTER COUNTY; AND
(2) MAY NOT EXECUTE A BUYER’S ORDER OR ACCEPT A DEPOSIT.
– 1 –

Ch. 488 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(D) AN OUT–OF–STATE DEALER OF MOTOR HOMES OR RECREATIONAL
TRAILERS THAT IS LICENSED BY THE LICENSING AUTHORITY OF ANOTHER STATE
MAY APPLY FOR A PERMIT.
(E) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL DETERMINE THE DURATION OF A PERMIT
ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(F) (1) AFTER A PERMIT HAS BEEN APPROVED BY THE ADMINISTRATION,
THE PERMIT HOLDER SHALL FILE A BOND WITH THE ADMINISTRATION.
(2) THE BOND SHALL BE ON A FORM PRESCRIBED AND FURNISHED BY
THE ADMINISTRATION, PAYABLE TO THE STATE, AND CONDITIONED ON
COMPLIANCE WITH THE CONDITIONS AND LIMITATIONS OF THE PERMIT.
(3) THE AMOUNT OF THE BOND SHALL BE DETERMINED BY THE
ADMINISTRATION.
(4) (I) LIABILITY UNDER THE BOND SHALL BE FOR THE DURATION
OF THE PERMIT.
(II) A BOND MAY NOT BE FULLY RELEASED UNTIL ALL
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION, REGULATIONS ADOPTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SECTION, AND PERMIT CONDITIONS HAVE BEEN MET OR COMPLIED WITH.
(5) THE BOND SHALL BE EXECUTED BY THE PERMIT HOLDER AND BY
A CORPORATE SURETY APPROVED BY THE ADMINISTRATION.
(G) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY SUSPEND OR REVOKE A PERMIT IF THE
ADMINISTRATION DETERMINES THAT THE PERMIT HOLDER IS OUT OF COMPLIANCE
WITH THIS SECTION OR ANY PERMIT CONDITIONS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 2 –